Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 16
DEALERS AND SALESMEN LICENSING

Sec.

§ 49-1601. Unlicensed dealers and salesmen prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person to act as a dealer or salesman, wholesaler, manufacturer of vehicles or a manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or distributor branch representative, without first having procured a license from the department. It shall be unlawful for any person other than a licensed dealer to display a vehicle for sale unless the title is in the name of the displayer. It shall be unlawful to solicit sales of vehicles without a dealer’s license, unless the title is in the name of the seller. The provisions of this section shall not apply to the sale or solicitation of specialty vehicles to governmental entities within the state. Specialty vehicles shall be defined as fire trucks, fire engines, urban transit buses, ambulances, street sweepers and hazardous material response vehicles.

§ 49-1602. Administration — Powers and duties.

The department shall:

Issue, and for reasonable cause shown, refuse to issue an applicant any license authorized under the provisions of this chapter. The department may refuse to issue all license types to any applicant, other than a partnership or corporation, if the applicant fails to comply with the terms and provisions of this chapter or the rules of the board, or if the applicant has been convicted of a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter, chapter 5, title 49, Idaho Code, section 49-1418, Idaho Code, chapter 6, title 48, Idaho Code, any felony committed in conjunction with a dealership or of any federal odometer law or regulation. Should the applicant be a partnership or a corporation, the department may refuse to issue a license to the applicant where it determines that one (1) or more of the partners of a partnership, or one (1) or more of the stockholders or officers of a corporation, was previously the holder of a license which was revoked or suspended, and the license revoked never reissued or the suspended license never reinstated, or that one (1) or more of the partners, stockholders, or officers, though not previously the holder of a license, has violated any of the provisions of this chapter or of an applicable rule or regulation, or of federal motor vehicle safety standards.

For just cause shown, revoke or suspend, on terms, conditions, and for a period of time as the department shall consider fair and just, any license or licenses issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. No license shall be revoked or suspended unless it shall be shown that the licensee has violated a provision of this chapter or of an applicable rule or regulation, or of federal motor vehicle safety standards. An Idaho licensed motor vehicle dealer or licensed motor vehicle salesman who is convicted of one (1) or more of the offenses set forth in subsection (1) of this section shall not be eligible to reapply for a motor vehicle dealer’s or salesman’s license until all outstanding customer complaints have been resolved to the department’s satisfaction and for the following time periods from the date of conviction: misdemeanor convictions: three (3) years for the first conviction and seven (7) years for every subsequent conviction; felony convictions: ten (10) years for the first conviction and ten (10) years for every subsequent conviction. The holder of a motor vehicle dealer’s license shall not be eligible to apply for a motor vehicle salesman’s license within the same time periods set forth in this subsection when convicted of one (1) or more of the offenses set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

On its own motion, upon the sworn complaint of any person, investigate any suspected or alleged violation by a licensee of any of the provisions of this chapter or of an applicable rule or regulation.

Prescribe forms for applications for licenses and qualifications for an applicant for licensure. Every application for a license shall contain, in addition to other information required by the department, the following:

The name and residence address of the applicant and the trade name, if any, under which he intends to conduct his business. If the applicant is a copartnership, the name and residence address of each member, whether a limited or general partner, and the name under which the partnership business is to be conducted. If the applicant is a corporation, the name of the corporation and the name and address of each of its principal officers and directors.

A complete description, including the city with the street number, of the principal place of business and any other and additional places of business operated and maintained by the applicant in conjunction with the principal place of business.

Copies of any letters of franchise for new vehicles that the applicant has been enfranchised to sell or exchange, and the name or names and addresses of the manufacturer or distributor who has enfranchised the applicant.

Names and addresses of the persons who shall act as salesmen under the authority of the license, if issued.

A copy of the certificate of assumed business name, if required, shall be filed with the secretary of state.

For a manufacturer’s license, the name or names and addresses of each and every distributor, factory branch, and factory representative.

For a salesman’s license, certification by the dealer by whom the salesman will be employed, that he has examined the background of the applicant, and to the best of the dealer’s knowledge, is qualified to be licensed under the sponsorship of the licensed dealer.

Before a dealer who is not exempted from the continuing education requirements as provided in section 49-1637(2), Idaho Code, may apply for a renewal of a vehicle dealer’s license, he shall provide to the department a certification from an accredited educational system, private vocational school, correspondence school or trade association approved by the department stating that the vehicle dealer has satisfied the four (4) hour continuing education requirements as specified in section 49-1637(1), Idaho Code.

Before any vehicle dealer’s license is issued by the department to an applicant who is not licensed with the department as a dealer within the previous twelve (12) calendar months and who is not exempted from the continuing education requirements as provided in section 49-1637(2), Idaho Code, the applicant shall provide to the department a certification from an accredited educational institution, private vocational school, correspondence school or trade association approved by the department stating that the applicant has satisfactorily completed the prelicensing class or program requirements, including a written examination of material presented, specified in section 49-1637(1), Idaho Code.

Refuse to issue any license under the provisions of this chapter if, upon investigation, the department finds that any information contained in the application is incomplete, incorrect or fictitious.

Require that a dealer’s principal place of business, and other locations operated and maintained by him in conjunction with his principal place of business, have erected or posted signs or devices providing information relating to the dealer’s name, location and address of the principal place of business, and the number of the license held by the dealer.

Provide for regular meetings of the dealer advisory board, to be held not less frequently than semiannually. Notices of meetings of the advisory board shall be mailed to all members not less than five (5) days prior to the date on which the meeting is to be held.

Inspect, prior to licensing, the principal place of business and other sites or locations as may be operated and maintained by the applicant.

Seek and consider the advisory board’s recommendations and comments regarding proposed rules promulgated for the administration of the provisions of this chapter.

Require the attendance of not less than one (1) or more than three (3) advisory board members at all hearings held relating to this chapter.

§ 49-1603. Dealer advisory board — Duties.

There shall be a dealer advisory board to consist of eleven (11) members to assist and advise the department in the administration of the provisions of this chapter. Five (5) members shall be appointed from licensed dealers selling new vehicles, four (4) members appointed from licensed dealers selling used vehicles, one (1) member shall be appointed from licensed dealers selling new recreational vehicles and one (1) member shall be appointed to represent new and used motorcycle and ATV dealers. The governor shall appoint the board with consideration to recommendations of the board of directors of the Idaho automobile dealers association, recommendations of the board of directors of the recreational vehicle dealers association of Idaho and recommendations of the independent dealer association representing used vehicle dealers. The term of office of each member shall be three (3) years. Vacancies occurring on the board other than by expiration of the term shall be filled for the unexpired term only, and each member of the board shall serve until his successor is appointed and qualified. Members of the advisory board shall be compensated as provided by section 59-509(b), Idaho Code, and payments of compensation shall be paid from the state highway account as part of the expenses of administering the provisions of this chapter. A majority of the members of the advisory board shall constitute a quorum, the presence of which at any meeting duly called by the department shall have full and complete power to act upon and resolve in the name of the advisory board any matter, thing or question referred to it by the department, or which by reason of any provisions of this chapter, it has power to determine.

The advisory board on the first day of each July, or as soon thereafter as practicable, shall elect a chairman, vice-chairman and secretary from among its members, who shall hold office until their successors are elected. As soon as the board has elected its officers, the secretary shall certify the results of the election to the department. The chairman shall preside at all meetings of the advisory board and the secretary shall make a record of their proceedings. All members of the advisory board shall be entitled to vote on any question, matter, or thing which properly comes before it.

§ 49-1604. Records as evidence.

Copies of all records and papers in the office of the director, authenticated under the hand and seal of the director, shall be received in evidence in all cases equally and with like effect as the original.

§ 49-1605. Change of franchise status.

Should the dealer change to, or add another franchise for the sale of new vehicles, or cancel or, for any cause whatever, otherwise lose a franchise for the sale of new vehicles, he shall immediately notify the department.

§ 49-1606. Classes of licenses — Nonresident dealers.

Licenses issued under the provisions of this chapter shall be as follows:

A dealer’s license shall permit the licensee to engage in the business of selling or exchanging new and used vehicles, new and used motorcycles, motor-driven cycles and motorbikes, new and used all-terrain vehicles, utility type vehicles, snow machines and travel trailers, truck campers, and new and used motor homes. This form of license shall permit licensees who are owners or part owners of the business of the licensee to act as vehicle salesmen.

A vehicle salesman’s license shall permit the licensee to engage in the activities of a vehicle salesman.

A wholesale dealer’s license shall permit the licensee to engage in the business of wholesaling used vehicles to Idaho vehicle dealers. The holder of this license must meet all the requirements for a principal place of business, except for the requirement of display area and adequate room to repair vehicles.

A vehicle manufacturer’s license shall permit the licensee to engage in the business of constructing or assembling vehicles, of the type subject to registration under this title at an established place of business within Idaho.

A distributor, factory branch, or distributor branch license shall permit the licensee to engage in the business of selling and distributing vehicles, parts, and accessories to their franchised dealers.

A representative (factory branch or distributor, etc.) license shall permit the licensee to engage in the business of contacting his respective authorized dealers, for the purpose of making or promoting the sale of his, its, or their vehicles, parts, and accessories.

Pending the satisfaction of the department that the applicant has met the requirements for licensure, it may issue a temporary permit to any applicant for a license. A temporary permit shall not exceed a period of ninety (90) days while the department is completing its investigation and determination of facts relative to the qualifications of the applicant for a license. A temporary permit shall terminate when the applicant’s license has been issued or refused.

The department may issue a probationary vehicle salesman’s license, subject to conditions to be observed in the exercise of the privilege granted either upon application for issuance of a license or upon application for renewal of a license. The conditions to be attached to the exercise of the privilege shall not appear on the face of the license but shall, in the judgment of the department, be in the public interest and suitable to the qualifications of the applicant as disclosed by the application and investigation by the department.

A nonresident dealer who is currently authorized to do business as, and has an established place of business as a vehicle dealer in another state, is not subject to licensure under the provisions of this chapter as long as the sales are limited to the exportation of vehicles for sale to, and the importation of vehicles purchased from, licensed Idaho vehicle dealers.

§ 49-1607. Fees — Funds — Expenses — Expiration of licenses.

The department shall collect with each application for licensure the following fees:

Dealer’s, wholesale dealer’s and vehicle manufacturer’s license, initial application, two hundred dollars ($200). Ten dollars ($10.00) of such fee shall be either retained by the department or authorized agent, if collected and processed by the department or authorized agent, or deposited in the county current expense fund. Renewal application, one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175).

Vehicle salesman’s license, thirty-six dollars ($36.00). Ten dollars ($10.00) of such fee shall be either retained by the department or authorized agent, if collected and processed by the department or authorized agent, or deposited in the county current expense fund.

Distributor-factory branch-distributor branch license, one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175).

Representative’s license, forty-four dollars ($44.00).

To reissue a license, salesman and dealer identification cards or other licensing documents at a dealer’s request, not resulting from an error by the department, a fee of eighteen dollars ($18.00) per document.

Supplemental lot license or relocated principal place of business, and temporary supplemental lot, forty-four dollars ($44.00) for license issued to a single dealer. A fee of eighty-eight dollars ($88.00) for a license issued to a group of dealers for a temporary supplemental lot.

All fees shall be paid over to the state treasurer for credit to the state highway account, out of which shall be paid the expenses of the department and the expenses incurred in enforcing the provisions of this chapter.

Dealer licenses, if not suspended or revoked, may be renewed from year to year upon the payment of the fees specified in this section to accompany applications, and renewals shall be made in accordance with the provisions of section 49-1634, Idaho Code.

There shall be twelve (12) licensing periods, starting with January and ending in December. A dealer’s license shall be in effect from the month of initial licensing through the last day of the next year’s calendar month that precedes the month of the initial licensing.

Any renewal license application received or postmarked after thirty (30) days from the end of the previous year’s license period shall be processed as an initial application and initial fees shall be paid.

Salesman licenses, if not suspended or revoked, shall be valid for three (3) years from the date of issue and may be renewed upon application and payment of the fees specified in this section provided that:

Employment remains with the sponsoring dealership; and

The sponsoring dealership has a valid license issued by the department.

§ 49-1608. License bond.

Before any dealer’s license shall be issued by the department to any applicant, the applicant shall procure and file with the department good and sufficient bond in the amount shown, conditioned that the applicant shall not practice any fraud, make any fraudulent representation or violate any of the provisions of this chapter, rules of the department, or the provisions of chapter 5, title 49[, Idaho Code], section 49-1418[, Idaho Code], or chapter 6, title 48, Idaho Code, or federal motor vehicle safety standards, or odometer fraud in the conduct of the business for which he is licensed.

A dealer exclusively in the business of motorcycle, motor-driven cycle and motorbike sales, all-terrain vehicles, utility type vehicles, truck campers and snow machine sales, ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

Any wholesale dealer in the business of wholesaling used vehicles of all types, forty thousand dollars ($40,000). Such wholesale dealer licensees shall be exempt from participating in the Idaho consumer asset recovery fund as provided in sections 49-1608B through 49-1608F, Idaho Code.

All other dealers, twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

The bond required in this section may be continuous in form and the total aggregate liability on the bond shall be limited to the payment of the amounts set forth in this section. The bond shall be in the following form:

A corporate surety bond, by a surety licensed to do business in this state; or

A certificate of deposit, in a form prescribed by the director; or

A cash deposit with the director.

If a bond is canceled or otherwise becomes invalid, upon receiving notice of the cancellation or invalidity, the department shall immediately suspend the dealer’s license and take possession of the license itself, all vehicle plates used in the business and all unused title applications of the licensee. The licensee is entitled to a hearing which shall be held within twenty (20) days of the suspension. Upon receiving notice that a valid bond is in force, the department shall immediately reinstate the license.

The bond requirements of this section shall be satisfied if the applicant is a duly licensed manufactured home dealer in accordance with chapter 21, title 44, Idaho Code, and the bond required by section 44-2103, Idaho Code, otherwise meets the requirements of this section. The amount of the bond shall be in the amount as required in this section or that required in section 44-2103, Idaho Code, whichever is greater. The applicant shall furnish a certified copy of the bond as required in section 44-2103, Idaho Code, to the department.

§ 49-1608A. Dealer and manufacturer liability insurance.

Every dealer and vehicle manufacturer shall, as a condition of issuance or renewal of a dealer or vehicle manufacturer license by the department, continuously provide insurance against loss resulting from liability imposed by law for bodily injury or death or damage to property suffered by any person arising out of the ownership, maintenance or use of vehicles owned by or under the control of the licensee and used in conduct of the business of the dealer or vehicle manufacturer. Such insurance shall be in an amount not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) because of bodily injury to or death of one (1) person in any one (1) accident and, subject to the limit for one (1) person, in the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) because of bodily injury to or death of two (2) or more persons in any one (1) accident, and in the amount of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one (1) accident. The applicant for a dealer or vehicle manufacturer license shall maintain on file with the department a certificate of liability insurance, issued by an insurance or surety company authorized to do business in this state or by an authorized agent of such company, in such form as may be prescribed by the director of the department of insurance as set forth in section 49-1231, Idaho Code.

§ 49-1608B. Idaho consumer asset recovery fund established — Expenditures authorized.

There is hereby created in the state treasury an account to be known as the “Idaho consumer asset recovery fund” (ICAR), hereinafter referred to as the “fund.” Moneys in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated to the department and shall be used exclusively to satisfy unpaid judgments as provided for in section 49-1608C, Idaho Code. The fund shall consist of moneys appropriated by the legislature and other moneys as provided for in law. All interest earned on investment by the department of moneys in the fund shall be returned to the fund.

Except as provided for in subsection (3) of this section, moneys paid out of the fund shall be known as expenditures and shall be limited to awards based upon claims or final judgments of fraud, fraudulent representation or any violation of: provisions of this chapter; provisions of chapter 6, title 48, Idaho Code; provisions of chapter 5, title 49, Idaho Code; provisions of section 49-1418, Idaho Code; or provisions of federal motor vehicle safety standards or odometer fraud as provided for in this chapter. All expenditures from the fund by the board pursuant to the provisions of this act, including expenditures provided for in subsection (3) of this section, shall be paid out on warrants drawn by the department upon presentation of proper vouchers approved by the Idaho consumer asset recovery control board as established in section 49-1608C, Idaho Code.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, no expenditures shall be made from the fund until the fund has accumulated one (1) full year of fees. When the fund reaches or exceeds two million dollars ($2,000,000), the fee provided for in section 49-1608C, Idaho Code, shall be temporarily suspended upon approval of the Idaho consumer asset recovery control board.

Claims made against a dealer with an existing bond, pursuant to section 49-1608, Idaho Code, shall first be paid by the bond before claims may be approved for payment by the board from the fund. From July 1, 2013, through June 30, 2014, all dealers shall be required to maintain the surety bond required pursuant to the provisions of 49-1608, Idaho Code.

§ 49-1608C. Creation of board and fees.

The Idaho consumer asset recovery fund (ICAR) shall be administered by the Idaho consumer asset recovery control board, hereinafter referred to as the “board.” The board shall be comprised of the director of the Idaho transportation department or his designee and the dealer advisory board or their designee(s), as established by section 49-1603, Idaho Code.

In addition to fees authorized pursuant to section 49-1607, Idaho Code, and in addition to any fees authorized elsewhere in this chapter, the Idaho consumer asset recovery control board shall establish a fee to be collected from each applicant for a new or renewing license issued pursuant to this chapter. The fee provided for in this section shall be charged for each applicant for a motor vehicle dealer’s license and the amount of such fee shall be set annually by the board. In setting the amount of the fee, the board shall take into consideration the balance of the fund and expenditures of moneys from the fund by all required participants. All fees collected pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be paid into the Idaho consumer asset recovery fund as established in section 49-1608B, Idaho Code. The department shall maintain an accurate record of all transactions involving the fund and report to the board at each meeting.

§ 49-1608D. New applicants and suspension of fees.

In addition to the fees collected pursuant to section 49-1608C, Idaho Code, applicants for an initial motor vehicle dealer’s license shall maintain a license bond pursuant to section 49-1608, Idaho Code, for three (3) consecutive years. If the fee has been temporarily suspended pursuant to section 49-1608B(3), Idaho Code, the new dealer shall pay the last set fee into the fund during the initial three (3) year licensing period. Only those renewing licensees who have not been the subject of a claim against their bond or against the fund for three (3) consecutive years shall be exempt from the requirement to maintain such bond as required pursuant to the provisions of section 49-1608, Idaho Code.

§ 49-1608E. Submission of claims.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, whenever any person is awarded a final judgment certified in a court of competent jurisdiction in the state of Idaho for:

Any actual loss or damage in connection with the purchase or lease of a motor vehicle by reason of any fraud practiced on him or fraudulent representation made to him by a licensed motor vehicle dealer; or

Any actual loss or damage by reason of a violation by a dealer of any of the provisions of chapter 6, title 48, Idaho Code, chapter 5, title 49, Idaho Code, or section 49-1418, Idaho Code, in connection with the purchase or lease of a motor vehicle on or after July 1, 2014, the judgment creditor may file a verified claim with the board requesting payment from the fund of the amount unpaid on the judgment subject to the following conditions:

Unless the judgment has been appealed, the claim shall be filed with the department, acting on behalf of the board, no sooner than forty-five (45) days and no later than one (1) year after the judgment becomes final.

The board shall not consider claims submitted by motor vehicle dealers, financial institutions or institutions providing floorplans for motor vehicle dealers.

To be eligible to receive any payment from the fund, any action instituted by a person against a licensee that may become a claim against the fund shall be served to the board in a manner consistent with the provisions of section 48-613, Idaho Code.

§ 49-1608F. Payment of claims — Maximum.

The maximum claim of one (1) judgment creditor against the fund, based on an unpaid certified judgment arising out of any loss or damage by reason of a claim submitted pursuant to section 49-1608E, Idaho Code, involving a single transaction, shall be limited to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), regardless of the amount of the unpaid certified final judgment of one (1) judgment creditor.

The aggregate of claims against the fund based on unpaid final judgments arising out of any loss or damage by reason of a claim submitted pursuant to section 49-1608E, Idaho Code, involving more than one (1) transaction shall be limited to one hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000) per licensee, regardless of the total amounts of the unpaid certified judgments of judgment creditors.

If a claim has been made against the fund, and the board has reason to believe that there may be additional claims against the fund from other transactions involving the same licensee, the board may withhold any payment from the fund involving the licensee for a period not to exceed the end of the relevant license period. After this period, if the aggregate of claims against the licensee exceeds one hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000), a total of one hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000) shall be prorated among the claimants and paid from the fund in proportion to the amounts of their unpaid certified judgments against the licensee.

Claims against motor vehicle dealers or their salespersons participating in the Idaho consumer asset recovery fund pursuant to section 49-1608E, Idaho Code, shall be prorated when the aggregate exceeds one hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000) against one (1) dealer.
(4)(a) Claims against motor vehicle dealers or their salespersons participating in the Idaho consumer asset recovery fund pursuant to section 49-1608E, Idaho Code, shall be prorated when the aggregate exceeds one hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000) against one (1) dealer.

Claims shall be prorated only after the dealer’s twenty thousand dollar ($20,000) bond has been exhausted and utilized first. Such additional claims shall be prorated when the aggregate exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) against one (1) dealer.

Upon receipt of a certified judgment filed in support of a claim against the fund, the board shall send written notice to the licensee who is the subject of the unpaid judgment that a claim has been filed and that the licensee should satisfy the unpaid judgment. If the unpaid judgment is not fully satisfied within thirty (30) days following the date of the written notice by the board, the board shall make payment from the fund subject to the other limitations provided for in this act.

If at any time the fund is insufficient to fully satisfy any claims or claim filed with the board and authorized by this act, the board shall pay such claim, claims or portion thereof to the claimants in the order that the claims were filed with the board.

On payment by the board to a claimant from the fund, the board shall, within five (5) business days, notify the licensee in writing of the board’s payment to the claimant and request full reimbursement be made to the board within thirty (30) days of the notification. Failure to reimburse the fund in full within the specified period shall be grounds for suspension or revocation of the license pursuant to title 49, chapter 16, Idaho Code. Any person whose license is revoked shall not be eligible to apply for a license as a motor vehicle dealer or for a license as a salesperson until the person has repaid in full the amount paid from the fund on his account, plus interest to be calculated pursuant to the provisions of section 28-22-104, Idaho Code.

Nothing contained in this article shall limit the authority of the department to take disciplinary action against any licensee for any violation of this chapter or any rule promulgated thereunder, nor shall full repayment of the amount paid from the fund on a licensee’s account nullify or modify the effect of any disciplinary action against that licensee for any violation.

The department is authorized to promulgate reasonable rules not inconsistent with this chapter for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this section.

§ 49-1609. Manufacturer or dealer to give notice of sale or transfer.

Every manufacturer or dealer, upon transferring a vehicle, whether by sale, lease or otherwise, to any person other than a manufacturer or dealer, shall within thirty (30) calendar days, give written notice of the transfer to the department or the assessor upon the official form provided by the department. Every notice shall contain the date of transfer, the time of transfer, the names and addresses of the transferor and transferee, any liens, a current odometer reading and a description of the vehicle as may be called for in the official form.

§ 49-1609A. Satisfaction of liens prior to resale of vehicle.

When a motor vehicle dealer licensed pursuant to this chapter takes possession of a vehicle for purposes of resale, the dealer shall have ten (10) business days from the date of possession to satisfy in full any and all lienholders who are perfected at the time of taking possession, unless the owner relinquishing possession of the vehicle agrees in writing to directly pay the perfected lienholder.

No such vehicle shall be resold or transferred to any retail purchaser until all perfected liens have been satisfied in full.

It shall be a misdemeanor punishable as provided in section 49-236, Idaho Code, for any person or licensee to violate the provisions of this section.

§ 49-1610. Right of action for loss by fraud — Process.

If any person shall suffer any loss or damage by reason of any fraud practiced on him or fraudulent representation made to him by a licensed dealer or one (1) of the dealer’s salesmen acting for the dealer, in his behalf or within the scope of the employment of salesman, or shall suffer any loss or damage by reason of the violation by the dealer or salesman of any of the provisions of this chapter, or chapter 5, title 49, Idaho Code, or section 49-1418, Idaho Code, or chapter 6, title 48, Idaho Code, or any applicable rule or regulation of the board, or federal odometer law or regulation, that person shall have a right of action against the dealer and his salesman.

Notwithstanding the terms, provisions or conditions of any agreement or franchise, or other terms or provisions of any novation, waiver or other written instrument, any person who is or may be injured by a violation of a provision of this chapter, or any party to a franchise who is so injured in his business or property by a violation of a provision of this chapter relating to that franchise, or any person so injured because he refuses to accede to a proposal for an arrangement which, if consummated, would be in violation of the provisions of this chapter, may bring an action for damages and equitable relief, including injunctive relief.

A license or a renewal shall not be issued to any applicant unless and until the applicant shall file with the director a good and sufficient instrument in writing in which he shall appoint the director as the true and lawful agent of the applicant upon whom all process may be served in any action or actions which may subsequently be commenced against the applicant arising out of any claim for damages suffered by any person by reason of the violation of the applicant of any of the terms and provisions of this chapter or provisions of chapter 5, title 49[, Idaho Code], section 49-1418[, Idaho Code], or chapter 6, title 48, Idaho Code, or of federal motor vehicle safety standards, or federal odometer laws and regulations. The applicant shall stipulate and agree in the appointment that any process directed to the applicant in such a case which is served upon the director, or in his absence his designee, shall be of the same legal force and effect as if served upon the applicant personally. The applicant shall further stipulate and agree in writing that the agency created by the appointment shall continue for and during the period covered by any license that may be issued and so long thereafter as the applicant may be made to answer in damages for a violation of the provisions of this chapter. The instrument appointing the director as agent for the applicant for service of process shall be acknowledged by the applicant before an officer authorized to take and certify acknowledgments under the laws of this state. In any case wherein the licensee be served with process by service upon the director, two (2) copies of the process shall be left with the director. Not later than two (2) days after the service of the process upon him, the director shall mail one (1) copy to the licensee at his principal place of business, as the same appears of record in the office of the director, postpaid, by certified mail with request for return receipt. The remaining copy shall be retained on file with the director. The licensee shall then have and be allowed thirty (30) days from and after the service within which to answer any complaint or other pleading which may be filed in the cause. For the purpose of venue where the licensee is served with process upon the director, the service shall be deemed to have been made upon the licensee in the county in which he has or last had his principal place of business.
(4) Whenever any person is awarded a final judgment in a court of competent jurisdiction in the state of Idaho for any loss or damage by reason of the violation by such dealer or salesman of any of the provisions of this chapter, chapter 5, title 49[, Idaho Code], section 49-1418[, Idaho Code], or chapter 6, title 48, Idaho Code, or any rule or regulation of the department in connection with the purchase of a vehicle, or federal motor vehicle safety standards, or in connection with the purchase of a vehicle if the loss or damage is a result of odometer tampering, or odometer fraud, the judgment creditor may file a verified claim with the corporate surety who has provided the dealer’s surety bond, or with the chairman of the dealer advisory board where the dealer has deposited with the director a cash bond or certificate of deposit.

The claim shall be filed no sooner than thirty (30) days and no later than one (1) year after the judgment has become final.

The claim shall:

Be accompanied by a certified copy of the judgment;

State the amount of the claim if different from the judgment amount; and

State that demand has been made upon the dealer for payment of the judgment, and the dealer has failed to pay the judgment in full within thirty (30) days.

(5) Where a dealer has satisfied the bonding requirement with cash or a certificate of deposit, the chairman shall make written notification to the dealer against whom the judgment was obtained, that a claim has been made. The dealer may, within ten (10) days from the date of receipt of the notice, submit written objections to the dealer advisory board as to why the judgment should not be satisfied from the cash deposit or certificate of deposit.

(6) Within sixty (60) days from the date the claim was filed with the dealer advisory board, if it has found the claimant complied with the provisions of subsection (4) of this section, the board shall authorize the director to satisfy the judgment from the dealer’s deposited funds in so far as he is able. Upon receipt of any payment, the claimant shall deliver a properly executed satisfaction of judgment or a partial satisfaction of judgment to the director. If additional claims have been filed prior to payment, or the chairman of the dealer advisory board has knowledge that additional claims are pending which may exceed the amount of the bond, the chairman may delay any payments until all claims are finalized. If the claims exceed the amount of the bond, the deposited funds shall be prorated among the claimants based on the amount of their judgments.

(7) A judgment against a dealer or salesman for violation of the provisions of this chapter, rules and regulations of the department, the provisions of chapter 5, title 49[, Idaho Code], section 49-1418[, Idaho Code], or chapter 6, title 48, Idaho Code, the federal motor vehicle safety standards or odometer fraud, shall be grounds for revocation of the dealer and the salesman’s licenses.

(8) The Idaho transportation board is authorized to promulgate reasonable rules and regulations not inconsistent with this chapter for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 49-1610, Idaho Code [this section].